Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7970.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 28-27 of the General Laws entitled "Mechanical Trades" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
28-27-35. Locksmith licensing.
(a) Definitions. For purposes of this section:
(1) “Apprentice locksmith” means an individual performing locksmithing under the direct
supervision of a licensed locksmith while completing required training or work experience.
(2) “Department” means the Rhode Island department of labor and training.
(3) “Locksmith” in Rhode Island means any person who installs, services, repairs, rekeys,
or opens locks or locking devices.
(4) “Locksmithing” means performing any activity defined under “locksmith,” including
key duplication and security system servicing.
(b) License required. No person shall engage in locksmithing or hold themselves out as a
locksmith in Rhode Island without a valid locksmith license issued by the department.
(c) Application for license.
(1) Applicants shall submit to the department:
(i) A completed application form with name, residence, and business address;
(ii) A recent photograph;
(iii) A certified criminal records background check issued by the attorney general or
municipal police department in which the individual resides;

(iv) Proof of training or apprenticeship;
(v) The application fee as determined by the department.
(2) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a license if the applicant has a criminal
conviction involving theft, fraud, violence, or dishonesty that bears on suitability to perform
locksmithing.
(d) Disciplinary actions. The department may suspend, revoke, or refuse renewal of a
locksmith license for:
(1) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining a license;
(2) Criminal conduct related to locksmithing; or
(3) Violations of this chapter or department regulations.
(e) Exemptions. This section does not apply to:
(1) Federal, state, or local government employees performing official duties;
(2) Retail employees duplicating keys on site under employer supervision; or
(3) Homeowners performing locksmithing on their own property.
(f) Rules and regulations. The department shall adopt such rules and regulations as are
necessary to implement this chapter, including licensing procedures, examinations, fees,
recordkeeping standards, and disciplinary processes.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005817
========
LC005817 - Page 2 of 3